tests/trilit.lexd
LEXICON C(3)
x y z
n m l

LEXICON V(2)
:a <v><p3><sg>:e
:o <v><p3><pl>:e

LEXICON redup
<redup>:

PATTERNS
C(1) :V(1) C(2) :V(2) C(3) V(2):
# xayez/xyz<v><p3><sg>
# xoyez/xyz<v><p3><pl>
# namel/nml<v><p3><sg>
# nomel/nml<v><p3><pl>

:C(1) :V(1) C(1) :V(1) C(2) :V(2) C(3) V(2): redup
# xaxayez/xyz<v><p3><sg><redup>
# xoxoyez/xyz<v><p3><pl><redup>
# nanamel/nml<v><p3><sg><redup>
# nonomel/nml<v><p3><pl><redup>
